Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-228
Assumption of district court expenses; when.

The Supreme Court shall assume as expenses the cost of word processing and data processing hardware and software involved in the operation of the district courts if those costs are for services provided on equipment owned by the State of Nebraska and the services have been approved by the State Court Administrator.

Laws 1993, LB 832, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 216, § 1.